cs: Profil řemene: Ozubený klínový; Ploché; Šestihranný; Víceklínový; Časový (ozubený); Klínové; Jiné
fi: Hihnan profiili: Hammastettu V-hihna; Litteä; Kuusikulmainen (kaksois-V); Moniurainen (serpentiini); Ajoitushihna (hammastettu); V-hihna; Muu
lt-LT: Diržo profilis: Dantytas V formos diržas; Plokščias; Šešiakampis (dvigubas V formos); Daugiabriaunis (gyvatukas); Dantytas; V formos diržas; Kita
zh-TW: 皮帶輪廓: 鑲齒 V 型皮帶; 平皮帶; 六邊形 (雙 V 形); 多溝 (蛇形); 正時 (齒型); V 型皮帶; 其他
el: Προφίλ ιμάντα: Οδοντωτός ιμάντας V; Επίπεδος; Εξαγωνικός (διπλό V); Πολυαυλακωτός ιμάντας (serpentine); Οδοντωτός ιμάντας χρονισμού; Ιμάντας τύπου V; Άλλο
de: Riemenprofil: Keilriemen mit Zahnung; Flach; Doppel-V-Keilriemen (Hexagonal); Serpentinenriemen; Timing-Riemen; Keilriemen; Sonstiges
nl: Riemprofiel: Getande V-riem; Vlak; Hexagonaal (dubbele V); Multiriem (serpentijn); Tandriem; V-riem; Overig
ja: ベルトのプロファイル: コグドVベルト; フラット; 六角形（ダブルV）; マルチリブ（蛇行）; タイミング（歯付き）; Vベルト; その他
pl: Profil pasa: Pasek klinowy zębaty; Płaskie; Sześciokątny (podwójne V); Wielożebrowy (serpentynowy); Zębaty (rozrządowy); Pas klinowy; Pozostałe
tr: Kayış profili: Dişli V kayış; Düz; Altıgen (çift V) kayış; Çok kanallı (serpantin) kayış; Zamanlama (dişli) kayışı; V kayış; Diğer
sv: Bältesprofil: Kuggad kilrem; Platt; Sexkantig (dubbel-V); Flerspårsrem (serpentinrem); Tandad kamrem; V-rem; Övrigt
es: Perfil de la correa: Correa trapezoidal dentada; Plano; Hexagonal (doble V); Multi-costillas (serpentina); Sincronización (dentada); Cinturón tipo corsé; Otros
pt-PT: Perfil da correia: Correia em V dentada; Plano; Hexagonal (duplo-V); Multi-nervuras (serpentina); Sincronização (dentada); Correia trapezoidal; Outro
hu: Szíj profilja: Fogazott ékszíj; Lapos; Hatszögletű (dupla V); Sűrűbordás (szerpentin); Hajtószíj (fogazott); V alakú öv; Egyéb
en: Belt profile: Cogged V-belt; Flat; Hexagonal (double-V); Multi-rib (serpentine); Timing (toothed); V-belt; Other
zh-CN: 皮带型式: 齿形 V 型; 扁平式; 六角（双 V 型）; 多楔带（蛇形）; 同步带（齿型）; V 型带; 其他
ro-RO: Profilul curelei: Curea trapezoidală dințată; Plat; Hexagonal (dublu-V); Multi-nervură (serpentină); Sincronizare (cu dinți); Curea trapezoidală; Altele
vi: Hình dạng dây đai: Dây đai chữ V có răng cưa; Phẳng; Dây đai lục giác (chữ V kép); Dây đai nhiều rãnh (dây đai tổng hợp); Dây đai cam (dây đai răng); Dây đai chữ V; Khác
ko: 벨트 단면 형상: 톱니형 V벨트; 플랫; 육각형(이중 V자형); 멀티-리브(서펜타인); 타이밍(치형); V-벨트; 기타
sl-SI: Profil jermena: Zobati klinasti jermen; Ploščata; Šesterokotno (dvojni V); Večrebrasta (serpentinska); Časovni mehanizem (zobčasti); V-pas; Druga
da: Remprofil: Fortandet kilerem; Flad; Sekskantet (dobbelt-V); Flere ribber (serpentine); Timing (fortandet); V-bælte; Andet
bg-BG: Профил на ремъка: Клиновидни V-образни; Плоско; Шестоъгълни (двойни трапецовидни); Многоребрени (серпентинови); Ангренажни (зъбни); Клиновиден ремък; Друго
nb: Belteprofil: Tannrem; Flat; Sekskantet (dobbel V); Multi-ribbe (serpentin); Timing (tannet); V-belte; Annet
pt-BR: Perfil da correia: Correia em V dentada; Plano; Hexagonal (duplo-V); Multi-nervuras (serpentinas); Sincronização (dentada); Correia em V; Outro
ru: Профиль ремня: Зубчатый клиновой ремень; Плоский; Шестиугольный (двусторонний клиновой); Многореберный (поликлиновой); Механизм газораспределения (зубчатый); Клиновой; Другой
it: Profilo della cinghia: Cinghia trapezoidale dentata; Piatto; Esagonale (doppia V); Multi-nervatura (serpentina); Cinghia di distribuzione (dentata); Cinghia a V; Altro
hr-HR: Profil remena: Klinasto nazubljeni remen; Ravna; Šesterokutni (dvostruki klinasti); Višerebrasti; Zupčasti; V-remen; Ostalo
fr: Profil de la courroie: Courroie trapézoïdale dentée; Plate; Hexagonal (double V); Courroie (serpentin); Courroie (dentée); Courroie trapézoïdale; Autre
th: รายละเอียดของสายพาน: สายพานวีแบบมีร่องฟัน; แบบแบน; สายพานหกเหลี่ยม (ดับเบิลวี); สายพานหลายร่อง (เซอร์เพนไทน์); สายพานไทม์มิ่ง (แบบมีฟัน); สายพานร่องวี; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Profil opasku: Ozubený klinový remeň; Rovný; Šesťhranný (dvojitý klinový remeň); Drážkovaný (serpentínový); Synchrónny (ozubený); V-belt; Iné